subreddit,title_selftext
ethereum,"March Mod Announcements 📣 Note on NFT Art Posts, Active / New Mods, Resource List Hey everyone 👋 welcome to March! Here are a few housekeeping items that I will combine into a single post.

# Note on NFT Art Posts

There's been a **ton** of excitement around NFTs on Ethereum lately. NFT stands for ""Non-Fungible Token"" - aka a digital object with provenance (who owned it when), and markets built into it, all enabled by the Ethereum blockchain. While the concept has been around for a few years, they've really started taking off in USD terms and public awareness. Learn more about NFTs here:  


* [The Non-Fungible Token Bible](https://opensea.io/blog/guides/non-fungible-tokens/) (by OpenSea) 
* [Non-Fungible Tokens (NFT): Beginner's Guide](https://decrypt.co/resources/non-fungible-tokens-nfts-explained-guide-learn-blockchain) (Decrypt Media)  


While we are very happy to see artists exploring new forms of ownership and patronage, the r/ethereum frontpage has become very full of artists sharing their work. Therefore, we've decided to start removing NFT art posts in order to keep r/ethereum as a tech and protocol focused space. Discussion on NFTs and their place in the Ethereum economy, or news from NFT companies, will still be permitted. A few places you can check out to post your work:  


* r/NFT is a great place to share your work and connect with other creators
* many of the NFT marketplaces have lively community discords ([Zora](https://discord.com/invite/Va58aMrcwk), [OpenSea](https://discord.gg/qXYcsp663u), [Nifty Gateway](https://discord.com/invite/vjFVZTx), many others)

# Active / New Mods

r/ethereum continues to grow daily - we recently crossed **700k members**! We're doing our best to improve the quality of the sub every day.   


Active mods include u/Evanvanness u/Twigwam  u/ligi u/edmundedgar u/vbuterin u/jbschweitzer u/souptacular . We've also added two new mods recently: u/trent_vanepps (me!) and u/always_question  


If there's anything spammy or scammy, please reach out! We're always open for other suggestions on how to improve the sub, so drop us a DM.

# Resource List

[High Gas Prices ⛽ Info &amp; Resources](https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/comments/lt8xgw/high_gas_prices_info_resources/)  
[EIP-1559 Expected Benefits, Possible Challenges, Misconceptions](https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/comments/lnp5jh/eip1559_expected_benefits_possible_challenges/)  


Thanks everyone for participating here!"
ethereum,"Being on crypto, do you also feel like you are living in alternative reality? I don't know if I'm alone on that but sometimes I am so deep in crypto, reading about new projects, such disruptive ideas, talking to great minds, seeing huge profits, etc, that it feels like I am in another reality.

It could also be a result of too much time on computer or books related to that, but when I go outside it looks like I am transported back to past 10 years. I know it is important to care of mental health, to balance things, although crazy things on crypto generates just a rush feeling that seems like if I stay off I'd miss the next revolutionary thing.

Well, just a thought that I wanted to share and discuss with other people on that field."
ethereum,"Go all in on ETH? For people who like ethereum... do you go all in on it? Forget the stocks, just straight crypto?"
ethereum,I just invested my first 1000$...what now ? So for about a month now I have been debating on purchasing some ethereum and I finally pulled the trigger out of the blue and right after I did it I got goosebumps...now what ?
ethereum,"Last will in ETH? Hey, 
I've been wondering whether ETH can provide the function of a last will in sort of a smart contract or similar... I also crossposted this over at /r/cryptocurrency but moons take most of the attention, I guess. :)

Anyway.

In case of my death I have to leave some important passwords to others and like to have them stored safely under my control until then.

I'd like to give the other parties access to an encrypted file which contains the passwords / important documents. The password to the encrypted file would only be released from the smart contract if my interaction with it does not happen for a set amount of time.
30, 60, days -  any amount of reasonable time.

As long as I am alive I'd also have to sign the smart contract to continuously deny access to the content.

In short:  a ""if not signed / dead man switch"" rule must be obtained to grant access.


How do I achieve this and which project does provide such a functionality?
ETH maybe?


Do you think ETH is stable enough to exist in the unforseen future and is reliable enough today in terms of security?


I'd love to hear your ideas.
Sorry, I am not a native speaker. :) Thank you!"
ethereum,"Gas fee question. So I have 1.1... UMA token. Roughly $29. It wants $20 in eth gas to send it anywhere. 

Now I can adjust the gas fees and was wondering the likelyhood the token gets stuck or something else should I pay say, $4 in gas to send it? (Using exodus)

I would think it would still go through just might take a little while or something, 🤷‍♂️"
ethereum,Buying ETH through Trezor Is buying ETH through Trezor’s system a good idea? Anyone have any experience with this? Safe and reliable?
ethereum,Can someone please help me out here? I have like 3-4 transactions in Que or Pending in MetaMask and I cant do anything with them I've looked up videos on what to do and i've tried to update the nonce with more gas (even though i've set it to fast gas option everytime.) And I cant do it because of the fact that [Etherscan.IO](https://Etherscan.IO) doesn't show that theres a transaction yet. But nothing is going through. Will I lose all of the ETH in this wallet due to this? Like since theres not very much ETH in the wallet will I lose whatever is in there after the gas comes out for the next transaction to ATTEMPT to be processed? I'm so tired of these high gas fee's and slow transactions its getting so frustrating... EDIT: I figured out how to get the NONCE number and have sent a transaction to the same wallet address with an updated GAS fee of 116 GWEI and like 55K gas limit and its still not going through I do also have one REPLACED transaction that has been pending for like 20 hours now that might be causing this but as I already REPLACED the previous transaction then that one should be NULL right ? What a freaking nightmare just to buy some NFTs...
ethereum,"Crypto Wallets: which one is right for you Wait, can’t I just leave my crypto on the exchange I purchased them on? Well, that depends on a few factors, but let us start from the beginning. 

**What**

Your crypto wallet is what you use to interact with a blockchain network and falls under one of three categories: a paper, software or hardware wallet.

Now, there are different use cases, but the tl;dr is hardware wallets are the most secure method of storing your crypto, with software being the most convenient and paper wallets being widely considered obsolete/unreliable. 

**How**

The first thing to understand about wallets is that they don’t actually store your crypto. They are merely vessels through which you can interact with a blockchain allowing you to send and receive the required information in order to perform transactions on said blockchain. 

Examples of this information include:

1. Your public keys
2. Your private keys. Never share this with anyone as it will mean they are able to access your crypto. Also remember, if you don’t own the private keys, you don’t own the crypto. Looking at you, Robinhood! Your private keys (or seed phrase) will also allow you to access your crypto on any device and that’s because your crypto never actually leave the blockchain, they just change from one address to another.
3. An assigned address that you will use to receive or send crypto to and from your wallet, which acts as a location on the blockchain. It’s okay if your address is public. When sending or receiving crypto, always ensure you are sending crypto to the right address.

**Hot vs Cold** 

Hot wallets are any wallets that are connected to the internet. Your crypto is very accessible and trading with your crypto is convenient.

Cold wallets have no connection to the internet making them less likely to be compromised by those evil people who want your precious crypto. Cold wallets usually come in the form of a USB drive device that stores a user’s private keys securely. If you’re a loooooooong-term HODLer, this may be the option for you.

A cold wallet is a physical device that uses a random number generator (RNG) to create public and private keys. The device, which is not connected to the internet, is home to these keys, making it a cold wallet and as a result arguably the most secure methods to store your crypto.

**Software wallets**

**Web wallets**

Web wallets make it possible to access your crypto, without having to install software - think metamask (browser) and your exchange wallet. You create a password to access your crypto, but in some cases, the provider will hold the private keys. Again, if you don’t own the private keys, you don’t own the crypto. If you’re leaving your crypto on the exchanges, set up multi-factor authentication, anti-phishing code, and withdrawal address management.

**Desktop wallets**

If you opt for a desktop wallet, you will be installing software onto your computer and you’ll be able to manage your crypto through that. You will have your private keys, which are stored locally on your computer. Encrypt it with a password as an extra precaution. BACKUP YOUR PRIVATE KEYS AND PASSWORDS because by doing so, you will be able to access your crypto on another device. Scan your computer regularly for viruses, malware etc.

**Mobile wallets**

These are very similar to desktop wallets but operate on…you guessed it, mobile devices making it incredibly convenient to send, receive and spend your crypto on the go. Again, BACKUP YOUR PRIVATE KEYS AND PASSWORDS.

Paper wallets are exactly that - pieces of paper with a crypto address and its public and private keys printed on it in the form of a QR code. A major flaw to this option though is that you are only able to transfer the entire balance to an address, making it the wrong option when wanted to send a smaller amount to an exchange to trade or to another address to purchase something. As stated above, this method is somewhat dated and is considered dangerous. 

**Finally, BACK UP YOUR SEED PHRASE AND PASSWORDS!**"
ethereum,"Can web3 be installed globally? I am getting ready to install the current version of web3 on a machine with CentOS v.7.8, 64 bit, and npm 6.14.11.

In the past, the web3 installation had some problems. Are there any issues with using the following command to install the current version of web3? **npm install -g web3**

1. Can I install web3 globally, so it will work with all domains on my server?
2. Do I need to make any directory current before typing ""npm install -g web3""?
3. Does the default web3 installation include the features of ethereumjs-tx.js, or do I have to install something else?

Thanks!"
ethereum,"gas price and gas limit question pardon me, I am new to eth. I gathered up some ethereum and now I am trying to move it to one place about $160. So I have two things on MEW wallet: transaction fee 169.00 Gwei and Gas limit set to 21,000. This costs me $6.6. I am wondering is it possible to lower it? I don't mind waiting for few hours/days. I am just trying to not make some horrible mistake here. Edit: Also the edit Gas button on MEW is broken so I cant edit the ""169 Gwei"""
ethereum,1 gas price? I was wondering about setting my gas price to 1 I am new to etherium and I wish to move some etherium I have mined to another wallet but gas price is a big deal since I mined like 20$ and I dont want to pay a bunch of money. I have no problem with waiting 40 minutes for a transaction this calculator says that i will have to wait 47 minutes so whats the drawback? [https://ethgasstation.info/calculatorTxV.php](https://ethgasstation.info/calculatorTxV.php) if 1 gas price doesnt work whats the lowest that will?
ethereum,"ETH Staking I very interested in ETH staking. Right now I am on the fence and am seeking out any advice, tips, lessons with staking ETH. I partially understand the risk involved but if someone with first hand experience can give me their two cents I would appreciate it. GLHF"
ethereum,"Sending ETH I have a quick question I got a small amount of ETH on an exchange and would love to send it to my wallet but it's around 5$ fees I guess?

Is this because of the high gas fees atm? Should I wait or still send it?"
ethereum,"Simple Ethereum implementation? Hey folks. I'm a software engineer with a good working knowledge of modern cryptography.

I'd like to know more about Ethereum from a technical point of view. My question is: is there a ""simple"" Ethereum implementation that I can execute and work with from A-to-Z that shows the ""basics"" of Ethereum (not ""how to build a smart contract"", but Ethereum VM itself).

Do please excuse my ignorance about the project and its scale: I do realize this project has been around for almost a decade and I don't mean to ""over-simplify"" it but simply to understand it.

Cheers and many thanks, folks"
ethereum,Who are the best freelance crypto writers? Argent will pay for outstanding content [https://twitter.com/argentHQ/status/1369625387697848321](https://twitter.com/argentHQ/status/1369625387697848321)
ethereum,"Bitcoin or Ethereum? As crypto grown increasingly popular, which coin do you think will win out? Or will they both be widely used?"
ethereum,"Best Times to Transact on the network? Anyone know which usual days/times of the week preferably in GMT time where the Ethereum network is the least busiest according to Ethereum's On-Chain data? 

Crypto market is 24/7 I know but there must be a time/day when the west Americans, the Europeans and the east Asians are not using it at the same time right."
ethereum,"Retaining ETH question Hi all, I have a question. With ETH 2.0 coming out at some point, will the ETH that I own now be transferred or converted to ETH 2.0? Will ETH 2 be a fork of ETH making ETH like ETC ( Ethereum Classic)? Should investors just wait to buy ETH 2 then?"
ethereum,Interaxis - What is an NFT and why are they important? Great intro video into the world of NFTs - [https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8tSayLCwMRo](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8tSayLCwMRo)
ethereum,"Need help finding my ERC tokens Hi, after digging for a long time, i realized i sent my tokens to this address

0x6722d2c25cBb8eCc134f0C95173e12fD818223F1

Can anyone help me to check which exchange is that?

Help is greatly appreciated."
ethereum,"Is this idea possible to create with a smart contract? Here's the context. So suppose I have a wallet on a platform that has 10ETH in it. Let's call it Wallet A. I want to send that 10ETH from Wallet A to Wallet B, but during the course of sending to Wallet B, I would like 20% of the sent Eth to be redirected to another Wallet, call it Wallet C. 

Is it possible to use a smart contract to do something like this? Or would I need to send the 10 Eth to Wallet B, then once it is in Wallet B I would have to send the 20% to Wallet C?"
ethereum,"What does it take to 51% a PoS chain? Hey, we're all familiar with ""control 51% of the hashing power of a PoW chain = double spending/etc attack"". But what about PoS?

As I understand it, you still need to control 51% of the validators, but you have to stake each one at (currently, 32) some fixed ETH amount. But this doesn't mean that you need to control 51% of ETH, right? Just enough ETH for staking so that you can run 51% of the nodes?

Obviously this is much, much riskier than the PoW attack from an attacker's standpoint, but I want to clearly understand the technicals here. 

Additionally, some of the reading I've done suggests that the mitigation procedures for after a 51% attack takes place are different for PoW vs PoS chains, and I'd love to understand better."
ethereum,"What’s one thing about Ethereum that most people here might not know? I’m just trying to grow my knowledge on this topic that I find so fascinating. I see so much future potential in this platform/crypto currency and there is always more to learn. So please, enlighten me."
ethereum,"Can someone explain the transferability of NFT's? If I buy an NFT on one site/marketplace, does it stay there? How does that work? Like if I buy a moment on NBA Top Shot (which is built on Flow I believe), does it transfer to something like Opensea, or have that functionality between marketplaces?"
ethereum,"What's with ethermine.org and the miners' collusion Seeing serious chatter all over the web about miners colluding on  ethermine.org (on the 1st of April) to scuttle EIP 1559

Really hope they don't anything nefarious and jeopardize this great project"
ethereum,"Why is Dorsey converting his NFT proceeds to Bitcoin for? As I understand it, the offers are in Ether. I mean why not leave it in ETH? This makes for good publicity for BTC because articles like [this](https://finance.yahoo.com/news/twitters-dorsey-convert-proceeds-auction-170336418.html) and like [this](https://www.cnbc.com/2021/03/06/jack-dorsey-is-offering-to-sell-the-first-tweet-as-an-nft.html) did not make one mention of Ethereum."
ethereum,"Can literally anything digital become an NFT? Hi all,

I think I've got my head around digital art NFTs and video NFTs however I want to know if this really expands onto all types of digital media.

Say Stephen King writes a new book and decides he's going to sell it digitally as an eBook - Could he make say 1000 copies of his book as EFTs as sort of a ""digital first pressing"" of their book, before selling non NFT versions on Amazon etc. some time later?

Apologies if this is already been discussed / this is a silly question!"
ethereum,"[Solidity question] Effective variables question. Hey, I'm just trying to understand the general context for effective variable use, as storage is expensive so every byte matters.

Integers are always 256? That's huge

Does that mean that being effective when having a bunch of smaller integers is to split a bigger integer into sections, like ""Bytes x-y""? Or am I missing something?

Your assistance is heavenly work. Much appreciated."
ethereum,"Making the ecosystem more light-client friendly One of the challenges of the current Ethereum ecosystem is that while the protocol is theoretically light client friendly, and [light clients even exist and can be used today](https://ethereum.org/en/developers/tutorials/run-light-node-geth/), they're not nearly as commonplace as was originally envisioned. Particularly, all of the following environments _could have been_ secured by light clients, but are instead typically secured by APIs connected to centralized services:

1. Mobile phone clients/wallets, even those where the key management is trustless (Status, Argent, Loopring, etc etc)
2. In-browser wallets (Metamask et al)
3. Other blockchains

There are two main problems:

1. The Ethereum light client verification protocol _is not light enough_.
2. There's not enough incentive to _serve_ light clients, leading to weakened performance.

We can think of each of these two problems as being tied to a corresponding one of the two key parts of a light client protocol. The first part is to download and authenticate the **header chain**, giving you Merkle roots to transactions and history and state; this is the part that is stymied by the Ethereum light verification protocol's heaviness. The second part is, given the Merkle roots, to get Merkle branches for any data you want to learn so that you can authenticate the data.

### Light client verification of headers

(1) is a big deal. For a light client to stay synced with the eth-PoW network today, they need to sync the eth-PoW _header chain_, which is about 600 bytes per 13 seconds: trivial for a phone or browser app, but already getting expensive for the light-client-inside-a-blockchain use case. And in all three cases, it precludes the user-experience gain of instant syncing after a long time offline. Even worse, the PoW algorithm (ethash) takes a long time to verify. Despite being explicitly designed for light client friendliness with its ""cache"" mechanism, cache-based verification still takes a significant amount of time.

The beacon chain has some upgrades in store, coming in the [first hard fork](https://notes.ethereum.org/@vbuterin/HF1_proposal), that allow light clients to stay synced with the beacon chain much more efficiently: a mere ~10 kB per day should suffice for basic connectivity. Verification will be significantly more computationally efficient than ethash.

Note that even before the merge, a light client of the beacon chain can double as a light client of the eth-PoW chain: the beacon chain contains a hash of an eth-PoW block about 10 hours old, and so a client could choose to use the beacon chain to sync up to that point and then download eth-PoW headers from there. This would not be nearly as efficient as pure beacon chain verification after the merge, but it would still be a considerable gain.

### Merkle branches

The problem with Merkle branches is simple. There are _a lot_ of potential light clients, and each light client wants to learn _a lot_ of information about the history and state, and it's expensive to send all that information and generate Merkle proofs for it. The problem is worse because there's no incentive to help send information, so relatively few nodes are doing it.

There are two main kinds of solutions to this problem:

1. Create a channel-payment protocol where nodes can get paid for supplying proofs.
2. Reorganize the p2p network to make providing proofs simpler and cheaper; see [Piper Merriam's work on this](https://github.com/ethereum/stateless-ethereum-specs).

But either path will take some time to get right, and there's a lot of work to be done (realistically there's a good chance we'll need to do both).

### A short term path

But we should not despair from the complexity of a fully functional light client network. **Even if all we can do is have a trustless header chain verifier, and we can't make a reliable and decentralized protocol to fetch Merkle branches, this by itself can greatly increase the security guarantees of mobile phone and in-browser clients**.

This is because instead of asking a server to provide responses to queries and trusting those responses, a wallet can now maintain the header chain locally, ask the server to provide responses along with Merkle proofs proving that the responses are correct, and verify the Merkle proofs. **This is an intermediate mode that would be nice to move the Ethereum ecosystem over to soon**. In the longer run, we can work harder on making a more fully decentralized light client ecosystem."
ethereum,"ENS - Where did my ETH go? In June 2017 I reserved 5 domains with the ethereum name service, transferring approx 150 ETH. I've claimed the ETH from ENS and only ~15 ETH were returned. Where did 90% of it go? Is there any way I can get it back. Would be happy to share some ETH if with a redditor or redditors if I can some how get back some of the 135 missing ETH.

I have access to the original account, photos of bid backups and can point to ether scan with the transactions"
ethereum,"Xbox-sized quantum computer at room temperature from IonQ by 2023 wonder how much that will cost per unit. This company just got merged with SPAC (DMYI, traded on NYSE)."
ethereum,"Can someone please explain how the data integrity in the Merkle Patricia Trie is verified? If you're a light client (SPV), I understand how in the regular Merkle Tree scenario in bitcoin you simply concatenate the hashes and rehashing them upward in the path toward the root USING with the Merkle Proof provided by the full node. But how is this done in Ethereum? Cause from what I understand about the Merkle Patricie Trie, it's different from the Merkle Tree in that you can't verify construct/calculate it by concatenating hashes and rehashing them. What exactly is the process used here to calculate the hashes upward eventually leading to the calculation of the root hash?"
ethereum,"Family members lost ETH in a scam, is there a chance for recovery? Wife and her sister fell for an ETH scam, not going to name the website, but I'm wondering if theres anything we can do to recover the lost eth. We have the addresses the eth was sent to, and the block chain transaction ID.

Is there any path to salvation?"
ethereum,"Pow vs PoS and why 32 eth to become validator? PoS vs PoW and why 32 ethereum to be a validator?

So im very new at mining but isn’t this more about making rich ethereum users way more richer? as many others out there is very hard to make 32 eth at this price? While mining is way more cheaper and its working fine for everyone? Please explain this to me! Thanks"
ethereum,"Stake ETH somewhere besides an exchange? Exchanges already have too much power over the market. Why stake with the big money and give them more dominance? Does anyone know where to stake ETH in some private pools? 🤔 


Or is this just not an option until EIP 1559 fully rolls out?"
ethereum,"Ethereum Berlin upgrade is coming soon! Read more about the EIPs included. Ethereum [\#Berlin](https://twitter.com/hashtag/Berlin?src=hashtag_click) upgrade is expected on the mainnet soon! Ropsten will be forked on March 10th. Upgrade your nodes with a Berlin-ready client version. Follow the overview of the EIPs included in ""[The Berlin Overview](https://medium.com/ethereum-cat-herders/the-berlin-upgrade-overview-2f7ad710eb80)"" and the  [EF announcement](https://blog.ethereum.org/2021/03/08/ethereum-berlin-upgrade-announcement/) blogs for specifics. 

\#upgrade #EIPs"
ethereum,"[Guide] All you need to know about EIP-1559, and more https://preview.redd.it/8p9ybwcomwl61.png?width=768&amp;format=png&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a3ca27a9c4b736efa2f0bd59b38649d93c2524a7

**Table of contents**

* What is EIP-1559?
* Why do you care?
* Is EIP-1559 good for ETH?
* Will EIP-1559 lower gas fees?
* How does EIP-1559 impact miner revenue?
* As a miner, how do I benefit from MEV?
* How does EIP-1559 impact Ethereum security?
* Why does basefee have to be burned?
* Can miners block the deployment of EIP-1559?
* How big are the UX benefits for users?
* Does EIP-1559 accelerate MEV extraction?

I hope some of you can find this resource helpful: [**https://uncommoncore.co/eip-1559/**](https://uncommoncore.co/eip-1559/)"
ethereum,"Best way to learn about decentralized apps, without getting overwhelmed I am interested in decentralized applications (much more than currency use case). It seems like Etherum is the platform for that. However even as some with a tech background (10 years of coding), everything is extremely confusing to me.   I will ask some questions and hopefully you guys have some guidance, thank you.   


1.) Is there any overall video or high level guide available on the state of the Etherunm user space.    


2.) With NFTS I see things like based on ERCXXX standard. What does this mean, are the different standards compatible.    


3.) When a company creates a coin on top of etherum. What does that mean, are they always easily transferable to other ETH based coins?   


4.) Is it possible to run arbitrary decentralized APIs on etherum. For example, say I wrote a web API in NodeJS. Could I somehow host it on the [ethereum](https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/) network, and route user requests against it."
ethereum,"Need help - Restoring Ethereum from 2017 smart contract Hi,

I used the official ethereum wallet from 2017. I did send 6.8 ether back then from my wallet to my smart contract. But now I can't open the ethereum wallet, but I have the **keystore file**. I also have the **smart contract address** and the **ethereum wallet address**. I also have the **password** for the ethereum wallet from 2017.

Can I somehow restore my account and send the ethereum from the smart contract to another ethereum wallet? 

I would really mean I lot to me, because I am in a bad financial situation and need the money. I would also give you a reward, when everything is working out."
ethereum,"Ethereum Exchange So you’ve gone head to head with bots, scalpers, and kijiji deals gone wrong, but you have prevailed, you’ve built a mining rig and it’s awesome! 

Now, what’s the next twist on this crazy ride? 

Well of course we have many options, some being:

-Hold on to your loot!

-Find an online business that offers goods for crypto 

-Buy and sell your coin on an exchange 

These are all fantastic options and widely used by many. What was that you asked? Oh you want to trade your digital dollar for some fiat? Of course you do, you need to pay off that rig right? Right.

Well this is the question that has me wondering as well. How do you trade your ETH for fiat dollars? Can it be done anonymously? Who offers this service? Are there preferred “vendors” or options? How is this being done? The bottom line is, how do you cash your ETH in for fiat dollars with emphasis on anonymity?

Maybe it’s just me but I find this to be a slightly overlooked topic when it comes to searching for the right answers on the web.  Which brings me to this wonderful community with never ending buckets of knowledge. Will you folks point me in the right direction? Maybe a few tips and tricks? 

I thank you all in advance for every little bit of info that you’re willing to part with. I love this community!"
ethereum,what would be the gwei price during congestion after EIP 1559? what would be the gwei price during congestion after EIP 1559?
ethereum,"What will happen to my ETH when ETH 2.0 comes out? I'm sure this is asked somewhere here, but I couldn't find it.

What is going to happen with my ETH when the new ETH 2.0 comes out?"
ethereum,"As a miner, how do I prepare for the big 2.0? Is it even worth it?"
ethereum,"Ethereum to become a deflationary asset? EIP-1559 Can anybody provide more insight on this being potentially true? Trying to get a better understanding of EIP-1559. 

Link here for GitHub page: https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/blob/master/EIPS/eip-1559.md

The page called this out at the end that got me thinking about the potential for ETH to be deflationary in the long run:

ETH Burn Precludes Fixed Supply

By burning the base fee, we can no longer guarantee a fixed token supply. This could result in economic instability as the long term supply of ETH will no longer be constant over time. While a valid concern, it is difficult to quantify how much of an impact this will have. If more is burned on base fee than is generated in mining rewards then ETH will be deflationary and if more is generated in mining rewards than is burned then ETH will be inflationary. Since we cannot control user demand for block space, we cannot assert at the moment whether ETH will end up inflationary or deflationary, so this change causes the core developers to lose some control over Ethereum's long term monetary policy.

Edit 1: thank you all for the responses! Kinda thought this might get taken down since I’ve never posted here but I appreciate all of your responses."
ethereum,"Old Macbook has 3 ETH in MetaMask - forgot password, any way to recover? First thing you guys will think is I stole some random laptop but I am happy to prove I own the address that sent the funds into the wallet in the first place.

I know this is a longshot but is there any way to extract the privkey from the hard drive? At this point, I don't care if I have to tear apart the 2013 Macbook Pro...

Any help would be much appreciated, you guys aren't Bitcoiners so please save the yOu'Re ScReWeD posts, this happens to the best of us. Thanks!"
ethereum,"Can anyone dumb it down for me - getting your art on Nifty Gateway (bracing for abuse!) Hate to be that guy (please don't downvote me back to the 20th century) but I've spent a good few hours not making sense of any of this. Googled it to death. It's just all foreign. 

I'm a digital artist with a half decent social media following. Trying to get into this new and exciting space yada yada. I have my MetaMask wallet loaded and ready to go. Got a few curated sites with pending approval so looking at Nifty. And all I want to know is how to mint my first piece and list it there. Their instructions are losing me with terms that I have no frame of reference for. 'Deposit', 'External Nifty', 'omnibus'. I'm lost. Other sites just have a 'create' button.

In general, where should the NFT be...'created'. Is it uploaded somewhere and somehow attached to your wallet? Like I say, lost."
ethereum,"PoolTogether has been the best thing to happen to me in the crypto space I put 35 DAI on Pool Together back in 2018 or something after a friend told me about it. 

Used ETH and swapped it on the site which allowed me to be eligible for the Uniswap airdrop! 

Sold all my XRP once the SEC suit was filed and decided to put it all on Pool Together. I won the jackpot on New Year’s Day!!

Finally the POOL token was airdrop and I got a decent amount of those based on my time and amount I’ve had on Pool Together. Sold most of it at $40+ per token. 

I would never even say I know what I’m doing. I just bought some BTC, ETH, and a whole wack load of altcoins back in 2017. It has worked out beyond my wildest dreams."
ethereum,"Smart-contract creator corruption and DAO control Hi there !

The following question is based on my understanding of the smart-contracts operation, maybe I'm wrong and I would be happy to be corrected.

So, I was wondering, if you want to be sure that the code deployed on the network is controlled by the DAO and not the creator of the smart-contract (to avoid contract creator corruption), but still upgradable, is there any way to achieve this ? What I mean by creator corruption is creator key stealing or purposely greedy creator that would upgrade the code to a version that would hurt the users.

Let's imagine that one developer wants to add a feature and proposes its upgraded version to the DAO. A vote would then proceeds to deploy this new contract, would that be feasible ? The compiled version could be authentified by comparing hashed version with everyone being able to compile the code and compare hashes for the proposed contract.

But then, would even the DAO be free from its creator if he had the private key to the address and wanted to modify the code ?

Maybe those questions are trivial and already answered but I was wondering if there was something I did not understand (like the creator's control over the smart contract) or if this was  already discussed.

Thank you lads !

--

Edit 1 : typo

Edit 2 : I found an answer which, I think, can be derivated to upgrade code on DAO approval : https://link.medium.com/qUD0IXLiseb

But still, I would be glad to hear your opinion !"
ethereum,"Search partial ETH address I'm trying to find e.g. addresses that include ""abcdefg"" in their address name, or  addresses ending in ""9876"". How would I go about searching for them?"
ethereum,"Ethereum wallet balances on a certain date?  I'm wondering if there's a way to see what my Ethereum token balances in my wallet were on a certain date?

It's for tax purposes.

Thanks!"
ethereum,"Staking or yield farming I've been trying to figure out yield farming, but trying to figure it all out is really confusing. It seems like blockfi and nexo offer about the same as staking more or less 5% (if you stake on an exchange, they take a cut and so the results seem about the same). Can other methods do much better than that?"
ethereum,"Any smart contract alternatives? I'm trying to develop a dapp but the gas fees are making it impossible to develop a proper prototype - for now.

I'm wondering, do any developers here have experience or suggestions for low cost smart contracts that work right now that are actually legit? I don't care about adoption, everyone knows ETH is the only whale in this space.

Cardano has no support for oracles and that will most likely remain that way for quite some time. I've read about Algorand and Ardor. Any opinions on that? 

Does anyone know of any good smart contract coin that has low execution cost, scalable smart contracts with small feesandd has support for proper decentralized oracle networks?"
ethereum,"Non-fungible Tokens with No Gas Fee With the current high gas prices, it can cost more than $50 to mint just one NFT.

I am designing a website that will use xDai to create NFT's with **no gas fee**. The website will charge a flat fee of just $1 for each NFT.

**You can create NFT's to sell your products or services.** For example, your NFT can include 10 hours of programming services. As each hour is used, the website will allow you to decrement the hours that are left on that token.

NFT's can also be resold on this website. Before purchasing an NFT, the buyer will be able to see how many products or services are remaining on that token.

**What product or service would you sell using gas-free NFT's?** Or would you use the NFT's for another purpose?"
ethereum,Converting to eth Big holder in xlm thinking about converting to eth.  Any thoughts or suggestions
ethereum,"A fundamental question I am far from a math wiz, but I have put in some time researching Ethereum since I began buying Ether. My question is this: are the goals of eth investors and eth users diametrically opposed? As an investor, I want the price of The ether I hold to increase, thus giving my investment more value. But wouldn’t it be better for users of the blockchain if the price of ether remained static or actually decreased? Can someone explain why I am a complete smooth brain for thinking this way?"
ethereum,What are the best NFT sites for Musicans to sell their music? Hey Im looking at what options are the best to upload my music and a NFT. What would the best sites be and is there a benefit to using one site as opposed to another?
ethereum,"NFT -- Lets have a serious talk, a lot of you don't seem to understand what they are. A lot of people are treating NFT like they ARE the asset they represent instead of what they really are and have been since the crypto punk days when they were first conceived on the Etherum network. This is a fundamentally wrong way of using them.

Yes, you could theoretically store an image or a small bit of text in the meta of an NFT, but you're going to pay massive amounts of money just to put it on the chain. Back when ETH was around $500/eth we're talking $2k per mb, so now... with gas prices what they are and ETH @ $1.6k... shittt..... you could be looking upwards of $10k for 1mb.

In reality most the time the NFT stores simple meta data and points TO someplace that the actual asset is stored. So these complex concepts you guys are trying to place on them needs to be reeled in. NFT at their core are titles, like you'd have for a car or home. They define some information about the object, but are NOT the object. You also need to realize that without a legally backed construct such as a trust which recognizes the NFT, you can not legally sell a real world titled asset using an NFT. Nor are untitled assets (drawings, pencils, brushes, etc) ownership recognized by possession of an NFT, legaly.

Yes there are a few examples of when NFT can BE the assets, but that's mostly in the ticket space where an NFT can be a 1:1 representation of a ticket. This space still has flaws though, because you either have to trade the NFT out of your wallet or trade eth out of your wallet to confirm you own the wallet the ticket exists in (and thus exercise the purpose of the ticket). So you end up paying whatever gas fees are at the moment to exercise your ticket, which makes the whole experience effectively worse than alternatives.

If people don't get a grip on what NFT are and this 6million dollars for ""ownership"" of part of a YouTube video don't stop, we're going to have some SERIOUS overcorrection by governments in regards to them defining what OWNERSHIP is.

Here's some reading: [https://opensea.io/blog/guides/non-fungible-tokens/](https://opensea.io/blog/guides/non-fungible-tokens/)"
ethereum,"How does cross-project composability work for the upcoming L2 scaling solutions? I'm seeing a lot of hype right now as L2 feels like it's actually turning into reality but one area that I don't have a clear understanding of is how composability will work in this new L2-enabled landscape.   Will we have a whole host of project specific L2 silos and we will incur L1 gas fees (and potentially long time delays, depending on particulars of L2) moving between them?

Consider a possible defi use-case and let's imagine for this scenario that each project has managed to implement its own L2:

1. Deposit ETH into MakerDAO via DefiSaver, incur L1 TX fees in, but once you are in there, fees are cheap.  Can engage with DefiSaver automation tools on the cheap as well (yay!).
2. Take a loan against your ETH collateral, incur L1 fees and potential time delay to get your DAI out of there.
3. Take this DAI now sitting in your wallet and transfer to Uniswap, incur L1 fees to get in but once you are in fees are cheap.   Swap tokens as you please, all fees here are cheap.   Provide liquidity in Uniswap pools, also cheap since you are in Uniswap L2 silo.
4. Transfer Uniswap LP tokens out of Uniswap L2, incur L1 fees and potential time delay.
5. Take these LP tokens and transfer them to some other yield farming project where you can stake these LP tokens for further yield.  Incur L1 fees to get into this other silo.
6. etc etc.

Am I misunderstanding how this is going to work?   I still see a lot of L1 fees/transactions here.  What am I missing about these magical L2 solutions?  What if the market takes a downswing and I find myself wanting to move assets back into MakerDAO to reduce my C-ratio?   Am I at the mercy of potentially slow L2 exit times or relying on some 3rd party service to advance me an equivalent amount within the desired L2 for a service fee?"
ethereum,"Best resources for simpletons like me explaining all aspects of Ethereum and DeFi? I would like to deep a deep dive on everything Ethereum and DeFi.

Are there any great blogs or resources that breaks everything down in a simple Explain It Like I'm Five kind of way?

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks"
ethereum,"Is EIP 1559 good for miners? If miners are forced to validate transactions at a base fee wouldnt that de-centivize miners as it seems like they are losing control to pick the transactions with the highest fee.

Sure the ETH supply might drop with new proposal, but with POW moving to POS the miners are going to have a lot of ETH to dump on the market if they don't stake."
ethereum,"NFTs and The Creator Economy: The new ""port of entry"" for all internet media In his essay “[1000 True Fans](https://kk.org/thetechnium/1000-true-fans/)*,*” Kevin Kelly predicted that the internet would transform the economics of creative activities:

&gt;*To be a successful creator you don’t need millions. You don’t need millions of dollars or millions of customers, millions of clients or millions of fans. To make a living as a craftsperson, photographer, musician, designer, author, animator, app maker, entrepreneur, or inventor you need only thousands of true fans.*  
*A true fan is defined as a fan that will buy anything you produce. These diehard fans will drive 200 miles to see you sing; they will buy the hardback and paperback and audible versions of your book; they will purchase your next figurine sight unseen; they will pay for the “best-of” DVD version of your free YouTube channel; they will come to your chef’s table once a month.*

But the internet took a detour. Centralised platforms became the dominant way for creators and fans to connect. The platforms used this power to become the new intermediaries - inserting ads and recommendations between creators and users while keeping most of the revenue for themselves.

Crypto, and specifically NFTs (non-fungible tokens), can accelerate the trend of creators monetising directly with their fans. Social platforms will continue to be useful for building audiences, although these too will be replaced with superior decentralised alternatives.

However, the only problem with NFTs is that beyond the surface level idea, no one knows what they are or how they actually work. It's time to shine a little light on them, how they work, and how not to get scammed.

#### What is an NFT?

Everyone knows the analogy of NFTs being collectables. Unfortunately this analogy is woefully inadequate at best, and actively malicious at worst.

NFTs as an umbrella term just means that each digital token on the network is unique. Each token contains a small bit of data that is unique to the token in question. That's it. They’re just little data containers being shipped around the blockchain between addresses.

Now, NFTs on specifically Ethereum (ETH) have a few data points that are unique to why anyone cares about them:

1. NFTs have their creators address saved as part of the NFT. Likewise, the current owner of the NFT is public information as well.
2. A royalty percentage can be programmed into the token. When the NFT token is traded at *any* time, between any two addresses for ETH or another currency, the royalty cut of that 'sale' will be redirected to the creators’ ETH address.

It's important to understand one more aspect of NFTs. They are *very, very* small. It's absurdly expensive to store real data on a blockchain, even something as small as a 64x64 jpg. Most NFTs are only going to have a few bytes of data stored in them. For example, a serial number or URL.

In short, an NFT is basically a **unique scrap of paper with a serial number, password, or web address on it.**

#### What NFTs are NOT

They are *not* digital media. They do not store digital media on the blockchain. If you buy an NFT for some image or song, what you're really getting is a Token with a URL hosted on some random web server.

NFTs do not prevent copying, alteration, deletion, or any other actions regarding any digital or physical thing they link to.

NFTs do not inherently confer ownership over any assets they link to. NFTs are just unique tradable 'scraps' with a small amount of information scribbled on it.

#### Why NFTs?

There are three important reasons why NFTs offer fundamentally better economics for creators.

1. **Removing rent seeking intermediaries.**  
Once you purchase an NFT it is yours to fully control, just like when you buy a book in the real world. There will continue to be platforms and marketplaces but they will be constrained in what they can change or charge because the ownership of assets shifts power back to the creator and users.
2. **Granular price tiering.**  
In traditional models, revenue is generated more or less uniformly regardless of the consumers enthusiasm level. Crypto products can easily be sliced and diced into a descending series of price tiers capturing a much larger area under the demand curve based on consumers’ enthusiasm level.
3. **Skin in the game.**  
NFTs change creator economics by making users owners. Customer acquisition costs are reduced to nearly zero. Crypto has grown to over a trillion dollars in aggregate market cap with almost no marketing spend. It's been able to grow so efficiently because users are owners - they have skin in the game. It's true peer-to-peer marketing, fuelled by community, excitement, and ownership.

#### How not to get scammed

1. Buying an NFT for 'ownership' of a thing when the seller doesn't own the thing to start with.
2. Buying an NFT for 'ownership' of a thing and getting non-exclusive rights, meaning the author can continue to mint infinite more NFTs of exactly the same thing.
3. Buying a 'collectible' NFT and the collectible site, host, or system goes under.
4. Buying an NFT for 'investment', only for that investment to have an exorbitant (50-100%) royalty fee. Meaning most of the proceeds of your investment go to the creator, instead of you, when you resell the NFT.
5. Buying an NFT and having the url host of the digital media go down, or the host changes the url so your NFT no longer shows what you bought.

#### Some other use cases

1. Cases where a website, app, or game can interact with the NFTs directly to show you your unique content, as proof of ownership of that content, although enforced by the host. ([NBA TopShot](https://www.nbatopshot.com/), [CryptoKitties](https://www.cryptokitties.co/), [Decentraland](https://decentraland.org/))
2. They make a good 'proof of attendance' or historical proof type tokens, which you could be given for attending a concert, getting your covid vaccine as a proof. ([POAP](https://www.poap.xyz/) \- The Proof of Attendance Protocol)
3. Similar to #2, NFTs are perfect for digital ticket sales. They can't directly be copied and even if they're sold on a secondary market, the original creator will get a cut of it. ([NFT.kred](https://www.nft.kred/events/tickets)) However, there are ways to still 'game' this.
4. They're great for money laundering. If you're buying some nonsense collectable picture of a cat on the internet, it's impossible to say you 'overpaid'. [Here's](https://www.coindesk.com/nyan-cat-nft-ethereum-meme) a Nyan Cat NFT that sold for $600k, opening the door to the Meme Economy.
5. Hedge against deep fake disinformation - we may need to use cryptographic signatures to prove origin or authenticity of a piece of content.

And remember, these are not just collectors’ items, they are programmable assets that any developer can remix. As developers build new contexts for NFTs to live, there will be compounding demand from creators to have their work included in this emerging metaverse and for collectors to flex their ownership rights.

Check out r/mrsk for more content like this."
ethereum,"Is it profitable to turn my own art into NFT's? First of all, I'm relatively new to investing, crypto and NFT's but I've been a digital artist for years. I'm still studying but I've done commissioned posters before and I've gotten a surprising amount of social engagement around my work on various subreddits as well as Instagram. Over the years, I've consistently designed posters in my free time, mainly centred around sports. 

I'm really interested by Ethereum and the sudden NFT surge (as I'm sure everyone is) but I've also heard about how discouraging gas fees and minting costs can be. At least on Rarible, the sports trading card section is dominated by one seller and the quality of their work is low, but the demand is high as they sell for thousands of dollars. It's a relatively small, niche part of the NFT market, but it's dominated by a couple of sellers who are making bank.

Again, this whole NFT thing is extremely new to me, but I'd be interested in getting in as early as I can. I'm sitting on about a decade's worth of posters that do nothing but collect dust on my computer. You can view some of my work on my account, but I wonder how it would transfer to this marketplace, and whether it would be worth it or not.

Whats the best way to sell your own art? Where? Is it worth it?

I'm still having a difficult time understanding the basics, and where would be the best place to start. I'm clearly quite lost and I'd appreciate any help or feedback regarding this.

Thanks"
ethereum,"ETH Wallet Suggestion? Serious question folks. I am diving into the world of NFTs (Digital art). I have chosen [OpenSea.io](https://OpenSea.io) for now since I am just starting. Now, on the sign up it asking me to select a wallet. It's giving me these options:

1. Metamask
2. Bitski
3. Formatic
4. Authereum
5. WalletConnect
6. WalletLink
7. Arkane
8. Dapper
9. Torus

I would have liked to see Coinbase Pro there but I guess it's not supported. Which of the above is good for folks starting out with NFTs? Any recommendations on safety as well?"
ethereum,"Understanding Gas Pricing Currently dipping my toes into Ethereum to purchase the new Kings of Leon album and grab the limited edition Vinyl that comes with it. I've added funds to my wallet and began the purchase through MetaMask.   


The cost of the album is something like 0.035 so about £38 but then when continuing the purchase I'm asked to input a gas fee. I understand the concept of gas and that's it's essentially the fee for the labour in completing the transaction. But in this case, the gas fee is just as expensive as the album itself. Is this correct? Just seems a little counter-intuitive that the fee for making the purchase is as much as the purchase itself?"
ethereum,"Sent some Ethereum today So I’m a Hodler, I NEVER cut loose of anything, but for the sake of simplicity my brother gave my daughter a check at college and he said he’s cool with 2 ETH (since his wife holds the checkbook)

Knowing everyone is talking about gas prices I asked him what gas costs and his answer was 157. Not knowing what that meant I just said “Is that .0157 ETH?

His answer was “a wei is 1 trillionth of a ETH so a Gigawei is .001”. After a 5th beer mental calculation I found the real answer was YES.

But It got me thinking, why do we have to make it so nerdy? Why do I have to make trillionth and millionth mental calculations during dinner just to send a few grand? 90% of the population forgot how to do an algebraic equation how can we expect them feel comfortable with transferring ETH.

(Yes I know ETH is not really a personal payment method, but he is an ETH nerd and that was agreeable with me as a hodler)"
ethereum,"does a decentralized game consumes gas ? as it uses contracts to be played, does it costs gas ?

who pays ? the creator or the players ?"
ethereum,"Ethereum 2.0 vs Cardano I’ve seen a lot of people talking about new ethereum updates and how in the future ethereum will have lower gas fees, will be able to process more transactions, will be more scalable and will be proof of stake. These seem to be a lot of the reasons why people view cardano more favourably, especially since now Cardano has native tokens and will soon allow smart contracts. Does anyone know how Ethereum will compare with Cardano after this update happens?"
ethereum,"How to benchmark the Hashrate for ethash algorithm? I am trying to nail down what algorithm is most profitable and ethash is one of the more promising ones based on daggerhashimoto, however, I cannot seem to get a good benchmark program for this.

Could anyone help me?

Thanks

Edit: I found a solution. First, download Awesome Miner, add your rig, and use the benchmark tool, more info here:

[https://support.awesomeminer.com/support/solutions/articles/35000086016-benchmark-algorithm-hashrates](https://support.awesomeminer.com/support/solutions/articles/35000086016-benchmark-algorithm-hashrates)"
ethereum,"[Solidity question] Is there a way to get a credible value from a different blockchain block in a contract? What I mean is. Is there currently a way to get (for example) information from block xxxx of the bitcoin blockchain (Or other popular chains) via effective solidity call? As in call an oracle service or something? Am I being clear?

So that via the contract I can validate a piece of certain information from block xxxx in a credible gas efficient manner.

Thank you code gods for your wisdom is beyond comprehension."
ethereum,"Amicable fork of ethereum I've answered a couple posts on forks and there seems to be interest/discussion. I've posted on the possibility of what's called an ""amicable fork"" and gotten no interest so here goes my last try (less half baked this time). 

I've always thought it was strange that forks are so contentious.   Members of the reddit-eth community, which I wouldnt consider indicative of the community at large, act with extreme vitriol to some of the side chains/or clones that are serving as trial grounds for the real deal (eth itself).  The success of these protocols should indicate there is some interest.

It seems to be dogma that a fork is a bad thing. Why? If you look at bch/btc split based on value (ie market cap) there was clearly interest and a purpose for bch.  In retrospect, rather than fighting the community could have probably gone about the fork earlier and more amicably."
ethereum,Some initial brainstorming on how we could increase address sizes [https://ethereum-magicians.org/t/increasing-address-size-from-20-to-32-bytes/5485](https://ethereum-magicians.org/t/increasing-address-size-from-20-to-32-bytes/5485)
ethereum,"Noob question: is it possible to create a nft that slowly destroys an image bit by bit with every repurchase? I'm a film photographer based in Amsterdam and though it would be a interesting idea to scan a film slide, destroy the physical slide and sell it as and nft that slowly fades/ages as with every purchase made. it ultimately disappearing completely depending on how many times it's resold. 

Any Feedback is welcome
Thanks :)

Edit: Thanks for all the helpful and positive responses publicly and privately. I never expected to see so many smart creative people be willing to help.
I think my best bet would be using multiple layers on https://async.art/

If anyone's interested in collaborating on a project feel free to shoot me a private message"
ethereum,"How do NFT royalties work? Can anyone explain how royalties work? I can't understand how you can have an 'automatic' royalty based on a percentage (of sale price I assume?)? How can the token be aware of the sale price? Unless it's locked into some proprietary platform but wouldn't that make it far less valuable than a token you can transfer freely?

If there is a royalty based upon sale price, why wouldn't buyers and sellers just understate the sale price?

I can understand how you could have a static/fixed or graduating ETH fee in order to be able to transfer the NFT but how could this be aware of the sale price?

Also what are the favored standards for creating art NFTs that would be most compatible with the best platforms for initial sale and later resales?

""Some NFTs will automatically pay out royalties to their creators when they're sold. This is still a developing concept but it's one of the most powerful. Original owners of EulerBeats Originals earn an 8% royalty every time the NFT is sold on. And some platforms, like Foundation and Zora, support royalties for their artists.

This is completely automatic so creators can just sit back and earn royalties as their work is sold from person to person. At the moment, figuring out royalties is very manual and lacks accuracy – a lot of creators don't get paid what they deserve. If your NFT has a royalty programmed into it, you'll never miss out."" - [https://ethereum.org/en/nft/](https://ethereum.org/en/nft/)"
ethereum,"ETH 2.0 is still years away Hi all. From what I understand, ETH 2.0 is still years away due to the slow pace at which it develops. Until then it is possible to see a huge development for DOT, BNB and even ADA. At least one of the platforms / currencies mentioned could theoretically dethrone ETH/ETH 2.0. What do you think?"
ethereum,How can I see the raw contents of an ERC-721 token on the block chain? How can I actually see the raw contents of an ERC-721 token on the blockchain/in a block explorer?  I guess they typically contain a hash and I don't know what else.
ethereum,"I'm new to Ethereum and crypto. What's with the crazy fees? I'm new here, please forgive me if I'm missing something. I just started learning about crypto and Ethereum. To play around, I bought a small amount of ETH (£10 worth) and sent it to a wallet. That ate more than half of it. What's left in the wallet can't be sent anywhere, because the fees are higher than the total amount. Fair enough — like I said, I'm learning. But here's my question: what could *possibly* be the point of such a currency (I'm talking digital currency, not other blockchain applications)? [Ethereum.org](https://Ethereum.org) talks about ""Peer-to-peer payments"" and calls ETH ""open to anyone"" and ""available in flexible amounts"", without making any clear mention of fees at all. I get it, there isn't a middle man — but in effect, it's just like banks, except slower and much, much more expensive. Isn't it? Why would I want to skip the middle man if he's much cheaper and faster than the revolutionary digital replacement? Thanks for any insights!"
ethereum,Ethereum transfer... noob here! I bought some Ethereum via coinbase in my phone. Can I transfer that to a Fortmatic wallet on my PC?
ethereum,"Wouldn't the EIP1559 ""tip"" essentially be the new gas fee? I could see miners preferring tx with a tip, thus creating a new fee market there? So, in times of congestion the user would have to tip more and more to get fast processing? Or maybe i'm not understanding how the tip would work?"
ethereum,"How will EIP-1559 lower fees? From what I understand, the current auction fee system will be replaced by a variable base fee which will be burned, plus an optional ""tip"" for the miners. This would incentive miners to choose the blocks with the higher tips. How is this different from the current auction system? This feels like it's basically the same fee system with extra steps"
ethereum,"Ethereum Hard Fork. Does this mean all ERC-20 tokens will duplicate? Or just the Ethereum token? If ethereum goes through a hard fork in july, what happens to all the ERC-20 tokens? Are they going to split in two across both chains as well?  Will uniswap get cloned across both blockchains too?  I'm just trying to wrap my head around the hard fork


Bitcoin hard forks produced new coins like Bcash and BSV, but these chains didn't have other tokens on their platform (obviously)

What happened with Ethereum Classic, did it have alt coins at the time? If so did they get duplicated across both chains? Thanks for the insight"
ethereum,"Transacted nothing and now I can't pay gas fees? [https://etherscan.io/tx/0x79576ab9eb9603480ecd340257f97d5a8df1286b5123c2f517010a2aea1c0ee6](https://etherscan.io/tx/0x79576ab9eb9603480ecd340257f97d5a8df1286b5123c2f517010a2aea1c0ee6)

I'm not even sure what happened. 

It's nice that there's a lot of interesting tokens available but this situation is absolutely silly. Somehow I transacted nothing and was charged for it when trying to sell my tokens and now I do not have enough to pay gas fees for another transaction?

Is my only option to purchase more ETH, transfer ETH to that wallet and pay even more fees?"
ethereum,"Resources for “idea people” looking for connections to Dapp builders? Sorry if this has been asked and answered but with this space growing so rapidly I imagine there are a lot of missed opportunities happening as viable awesome ideas never materialize because they’re held in the brain of someone without any knowledge of how to properly build what needs to be built. 

Any advice for how to bridge this gap? If someone has an idea for something to be built on Ethereum, where should they start?"
ethereum,"Please Help - can someone help recovering from the DAO contract? I invested in the DAO and thought that the funds were gone for years, only discovered recently that they are actually still recoverable?

Does anyone know how i can get the funds out?

Transaction: [https://etherscan.io/tx/0x5d2ef7e141048f798eb20d73ab161888e9bddc36634d5162f19d521d99488703](https://etherscan.io/tx/0x5d2ef7e141048f798eb20d73ab161888e9bddc36634d5162f19d521d99488703)"
ethereum,"How to create a warning on top of an address in Etherscan? Today I came across this [https://etherscan.io/address/0x905315602ed9a854e325f692ff82f58799beab57](https://etherscan.io/address/0x905315602ed9a854e325f692ff82f58799beab57) while reading about Cream Hack

I wonder how this warning is created?

[https://imgur.com/RE8XIgz](https://imgur.com/RE8XIgz)"
ethereum,"Which wallet is best for Ethereum? Hey guys, new around here.

I'm looking into buying some Ethereum for long-term holding, but I'm pretty undecided as to which wallet would be safer, Google hasn't brought me super far either any tips would be appreciated."
ethereum,"Law of Unintended Consequences, what will be the unexpected effects or 1559? As the title says, what do you think will be some unforeseen results of 1559? 

miners screaming over expected profit cuts, hodl'ers expecting some sort of deflation/increased eth price, 

I feel this plays out the opposite for some reason."
ethereum,"Two probably dumb technical questions about proof of stake security I was reading about how proof of stake consensus works on ethereum.org [here](https://ethereum.org/en/developers/docs/consensus-mechanisms/pos/) but I have two questions:

1. How do we elect which validator actually creates the block? I know it’s random but how does that random calculation work? I read about Randao, but is that model secure enough to help pick a validator? Wouldn’t it be insecure if the randao contract itself was running on the same blocks it’s helping to select who gets to mine? Could a malicious actor exploit how random numbers are chosen here so that they get to always be the validation who creates a block?

2. What is the benefit of having many validators agree on checkpoints? Why is it insufficient to just randomly choose a validator to create a block, and if everyone is running a node with the same consensus rules then nobody would consider using/building on top of a malicious/incorrectly constructed block

Thanks, and sorry if these are obvious/dumb questions"
ethereum,"Just found out you can get loans on Ethereum, but AAVE sounds too good. Is there a catch? So guys, I hope this isn't off topic. I recently had to spend some money and unfortunately sold my ETH. Then my friend told me I could just have gotten an AAVE loan for USDC for like 8% interest a year, meaning if I borrowed 1k USDC, I'd have to pay 1080 USDC after a year.

Is it really that simple? It seems like a very cheap borrow. When I hear the word ""borrow"" I expect to have to pay at least 60%, 70% interest a year, so this sounds really interesting."
ethereum,How can I buy ethereum without Verification or ID The reason I want to do so is because I live in third world country and we only have virtual credit card. And the big trading platform doesn't accept virtual card. The card must be in your name.
ethereum,"General Inquiry Re. Software Wallet Security and Cold Wallets Hey all,

My background is pretty ""all-over-the-place"" re. the crypto scene. I am currently lacking in some information regarding the storage of currencies, though.

I have been interested in Ethereum because of it's utility, and currently have some stored on a site hot-wallet.

For practical purposes, I would like to move this to a software-based wallet (Cold storage would be inconvenient, currently).

Currently, the considerations are Exodus and MetaMask.

My question regarding these platforms is:

\- If I have a system with one of these installed, if the software is closed, or not running, are there still security issues? Do they have background processes? What are primary concerns with software wallets?

\- If you make an image of your Operating System on a regular basis, isn't this essential backing up the private keys in the software, and functioning as an equivalent to cold storage?

Thanks all!"
ethereum,"Why the Merge Should Be Prioritized Over Data Sharding **Some Background**

The roadmap for Ethereum has evolved over the years, in good ways.  Not too long ago, ETH 2 was divided into phases, roughly as follows:

Phase 0: Staking on the Beacon chain (completed / happens today).  
Phase 1: Data Sharding.  
Phase 1.5: the Merge.  
Phase 2: TBD (this phase is/was the most nebulous; basically, there could be further improvements made to Ethereum).

**These Phases Need Not Happen Chronologically**

In recent months, Vitalik, Danny R., and others, have clarified that Phases 1 and 1.5 need not occur in that order.  In other words, the Merge could be prioritized and implemented before Data Sharding.  I urge the community to prioritize the Merge over Data Sharding for at least the following reasons:

* Rollup tech buys us time.  Both optimistic rollups and ZK rollups are now coming online.  These have the ability to scale Ethereum from less than 10 TPS to over 1000 TPS.  We gain at least two orders of magnitude of scaling with rollups.  Once major DAPPs such as Uniswap migrate to L2 (it is happening!), then fee pressure on L1 will be greatly alleviated.  And it is all happening in the short term, over the course of the next few months.  I estimate that this will provide at least 1 to 2 years before Data Sharding is needed to further scale Ethereum to 100,000+ TPS.
* Having the Merge at the ready provides a fallback for the community should a cartel of miners collude to neutralize the positive effects of EIP 1559.  There are some within the mining community who have threatened to form a group of miners to essentially prevent some aspects of EIP 1559 from having their intended effect.  While I believe it would be difficult or impossible for this group of miners to pull this off, there is a small chance that they might be successful.  The community would rightly interpret such an action to be an attack on the network.  The mere fact that the Merge is prioritized before Data Sharding might be enough to ward off such an attack like a Sword of Damocles, given that the Merge is the final separation of POW miners from the network.  This would further incentivize the mining community not to attempt to subvert the network.
* The Merge brings immediate liquidity to POS stakers who have tied up their ETH.
* The Merge is technically less complex than Data Sharding, albeit still with significant implications to the network.  It shouldn't be rushed, but it also should not be delayed.  Careful development with multiple testnets are obviously called for.  Overall, it is better to implement the technically-less-complex option having more immediate benefits to the community, and then shift community attention to the technically-more-challenging Data Sharding effort."
ethereum,"Anyone stake using Ankr? Found this, [https://eth2.ankr.com/](https://eth2.ankr.com/) and was wondering if it was a legit way to stake ETH. I figured out how to do it with a trezor hardware wallet and metamask, but before I was about to stake it looked like I was sending them my ETH. When I did this with ADA I got to keep my ADA. Is this legit? Anyone else do this?"
ethereum,"How does PoS affect EIP1559? Hi guys. With the recent EIP 1559 announcement, what happens when eth switches to PoS? Does the eip become irrelevant? Or does the gas burning etc remain in place? 

Thank you in advance."
ethereum,"How to make sure an ERC20 token withdrawal doesn’t fail? Please help Hello fellow crypto enthusiasts,

I’m asking for help in trying to withdraw some Lukso coins I have on My Ether Wallet. Trying to deposit them into KuCoin exchange since they’re one of the only exchanges that list LYXe.

One of my transactions failed a few weeks ago and I lost like 70$ worth of ether, so I reallyyyy want to avoid that happening again. I got about 180 coins thru the ICO. Wish I got more because Lukso is actually doing really well, which is why I don’t mind spending like 100$ to withdraw them.

Anyway, can anyone tell me how to withdraw my tokens from MEW to KuCoin without it failing? What should I set the gas limit as? I’m worried if I set it to the max I’ll pay like 300$ and on the other hand I want to avoid what I did last time which is set it too low (even though it still cost about 70$!).

Thanks for your help!"
ethereum,"If I buy eth now, what will happen to it after the fork? If I buy eth now, what will happen to it after the fork? Is it the same coin I'm buying?"
ethereum,"New to crypto but I have been saving for quite awhile and I’ll be turning 20 in June. I have roughly 16k in my savings. I’m good on making credit card Payments on time and I said fuck it and bought 3 ETH coins. Was this a big fuck up or should I ride it out? Any body with some actual knowledge who could point me in the write directions would be fantastic. I hate seeing more negative energy consume us and it carries on to one another. I’m really not looking for some smart ass remarks, frankly. If anybody is willing to point me in the write directions that would be awesome! Been saving since I was 11 doing landscaping and then I got into the pizza business and I’m making decent money as of now. Plus I use acorns as well.


TL:DR bought 3 ETH coins when they were roughly $1,485. Was this a god move or did I screw myself"
ethereum,"Can't see wrapped Ethereum on Binance wallet Hi,

I received wrapped ethereum from a friend who sent them to my Binance ethereum wallet by mistake. However I never received them or cannot see them. On etherscan I can see the wallet holding the wrapped ETH.

How could I possibly retrieve these?

Thanks."
ethereum,"Conditional token ownership Is there a way to set up a contract that issues tokens that are only held in other (non-contract) addresses, as long as a certain condition is fulfilled? 

As soon as the condition is no longer met the tokens would ideally revert back to the issuing address or another specified address"
ethereum,"Can anyone answer a few questions about NFT's I understand what they are, i have a couple of questions about them. 


Whats the legality of selling an NFT with something that is trademarked of copyrighted.  Since the blockchain is anonymous  how is coca cola going to take action againt wallet id xx0w203nb0v02324nc0823947g7v0c8n30g when they sell an NFT of their logo?

whats stoping an artist of selling a piece of art and then turning around renaming the art and sellings it again (basically making copies)"
ethereum,"Good reading on Game Theory and Tokens Economics? I'm looking for books or articles about game theory and token economics. Anyone have any good suggestions?  


I'm looking for stuff that's somewhat noob friendly. I'm pretty familiar with technicals of blockchain, but the economics I'm fuzzy on."
ethereum,"Once EIP 1559 is implemented in July, which mining pool would be the best? I'm currently using Ethermine, but wanted to know if it will be worthwhile to chance over to Sparkpool since EIP 1559 difficulty will increase and that pool appears to be the biggest."
ethereum,"How will EIP 1559 affect ETH2.0? This might be a very dumb question but I am a bit confused as to how exactly EIP 1559 will affect ETH 2.0. From what I understand EIP 1559 will only affect miners and won't affect staking when staking is made available, EIP 1559 is just to stabilize gas prices for the time being until ETH 2.0 brings them down. 

Is this the right way to think about it?"
ethereum,"EIP 1559 - miner acceptance question I understand that some (perhaps a majority) of the miners are opposed to EIP 1559.  What is the likelihood that this opposition leads to a contentious split and how might that play out if it happens?  I.e. are we potentially looking at an ETH Classic 2 situation, or is that simply very unlikely and is just FUD that is being spread?"
ethereum,"A Question on NFTs Hi, sorry for the nooby question I know you probably get them everyday but I'm a digital artist trying to get my head around NFT's and the new digital art wave that is happening at the moment

My first question is do all the platforms have such a high sellers fee? I tried to list something yesterday and before I could list it told me I had to pay them $100 worth of ethereum, which obviously I am not going to pay just to test the waters and try to figure out how this thing works

also I don't understand where these NFT's go once you buy them and what you do with them? where is this community/underground scene that is raving about them?

why would you buy a jpeg/png file when there are 100000's on the internet, digital art has never been valued like this before and I'm just a little confused why everyone cares about unique art and originality all of a sudden when its become so saturated in the design/art market

if anyone has any resources, references or communities for further study and immersing myself in the world it would be greatly appreciated

I'm relatively new to the crypto world so I know im probably missing alot of information

thank you"
ethereum,"Vitalik Buterin on the Rationally Speaking Podcast | Intellectual honesty, cryptocurrency, &amp; more [Link to podcast page](http://rationallyspeakingpodcast.org/show/episode-253-intellectual-honesty-cryptocurrency-more-vitalik.html). Also available on wherever you get your podcasts I imagine. [The transcript is also available](http://rationallyspeakingpodcast.org/storage/transcripts/rs253transcript.pdf)

Really fun to hear Buterin talk about how he thinks."
ethereum,How to run Eth2 node on Amazon Managed Blockchain Service? Has anyone tried to run an Eth2 node with the newly supported AWS Ethereum managed blockchain?  Does it support Eth2?
ethereum,"How to Write a dApp? I know smart contracts run on nodes. dApp's are basically smart contracts, right? If a person wanted to release their dApp, do they need a node of their own? Or do they upload their code onto a node somewhere? What's this ecosystem like?

Also, it is true that once a smart contract has been release it cannot be modified? That's why there's so many v2 out there?"
ethereum,"Locked Parity Multisig Funds Unlocked in EIP-1559 ? Someone told me that the funds from the Parity Multisig fiasco would be unlocked in this next hard fork. Is that true or not?

When browsing the EIP notes I can't find anything about it."
ethereum,"Safest way to get some exposure to the NFT trend ?  I really don't understand NFTs but it seems like it's getting hyped up everywhere by everyone , including big players. I really don't want to invest in something that doesnt make sense to me, but I'd like to have at least a bit of exposure in case it takes off

What's the best/safest way to get exposure to the NFT craze without actually owning any ? (besides owning eth)

Thank you!"
ethereum,"Best Wallets? Hi, so I’m considering investing in Eth &amp; before I buy a Ledger Nano S for my new laptop in a few months (as current laptop is on it’s last legs &amp; I think it’s easier just to set up on 1 laptop I assume..) Whats the best IOS wallet to keep my Eth in until then? 

Thanks!"
ethereum,"Thoughts on the carbon footprint of PoW / Eth? There's been a lot of chatter on Twitter recently about the carbon footprint of PoW and ethereum.

Its mainly from the NFT community and looks like it was started by this nifty (pun intended) calculator: 

https://carbon.fyi 

Some people are coming out saying that anyone using PoW is evil and we need to boycott Ethereum.

Others saying the numbers are BS or at the very least that NFT community is a tiny contributor of total network footprint."
ethereum,"What does it mean to 'stake' ETH 2.0? I've been in crypto for about a year and  despite some research, I am a little embarrassed to say I still don't quite understand what it means to 'stake' a coin. Can anyone explain it to me in terms I might more easily understand?"
ethereum,"Tax on NFTs  Hi

Looking into the minting of NFTs of some digital art and had some questions regarding taxes.

I am a UK citizen and from some initial reading it seems that capital gains tax would be due on the sale of any crypto assets - can anyone from the UK confirm based on their experiences?

Also, is there any sales tax or VAT due on the sale of NFTs?"
ethereum,"PSA: Before you update to Geth 1.10.0 The most recent Geth release introduces massive changes to the database structure (introducing snapshot generation), and also brings feature called ""Transaction unindexing""

The first time you run new release of the client, it will run both of them in parallel, requiring **massive** amount of I/O operations.

In case of Raspberry Pi users like me, or if low-end SSD is used, **expect the node to temporarily fall out of sync.**

My setup is Rpi 4 + Samsung 860 EVO SSD, and for a period of ~24h node was lagging upto ~30 minutes behind the most recent block. Once the transaction unindexing is completed, snapshot generation alone isn't posing any significant issues (altough its time estimation is worthless, it went from 240h to &gt;5000h, to 800h now and dropping rapidly)

If you're using Geth for something critical, like staking, make sure you have a hardware powerful enough to handle it, and/or a backup solution just in case."
ethereum,"Quick question about mining: does it only stop when ETH 2.0 is fully released (i.e two years from now)? I have heard mixed information, some say that mining will stop in a few months as ETH moves to PoS and others say mining will continue for one or two years at least. What is the correct answer?"
ethereum,"Cold wallet vs savings account Hey guys, I would like some recommendations regarding keeping crypto in a cold wallet ( ledger) vs the idea offered by apps (like crypterium - finance - nexo) to keep them into a savings account and earns interest from 4-6%. I understand that there is a risk to keep your crypto online but what are the odds? Even having your money in crypto is a risk."
ethereum,"Downsides of Proof of Stake? What are the downsides of Proof of stake vs proof of work? I'd like to ask in r/Bitcoin but it seems blasphemy to even ask that question in that echo chamber, so I ask it here because Ethereum has both and is migrating towards PoS. 

As we all know Proof of Work is not environmentally completely optimal, though Bitcoin might still have an environmentally positive net effect on the environment due to less spending of a deflationary asset in the economy. Proof of Work and lack of throughput are the only things I don't like about Bitcoin. It seems Ethereum aims to solve both these issues through Proof of Stake and sharding. 

So to the question. Why don't everybody use Proof of Stake when it's environmentally superior? There must be downsides to it otherwise the choice would be given. Please keep a good tone."
ethereum,"Miners upset with EIP-1559? I have seen a lot of comments about Etheruem being too centralized off of this decision and miners are saying that it is going to kill the coin. What do you guys think about this? I see it as a good thing, high gas fees can kill the coin while miners get the short-term profits."
ethereum,"How does L2 keep the security of Ethereum? Explain like I'm 5 please.  


If we add layers on top of the ETH PoW mechanism, how does that new layer adhere to the security and trust we have come to love about Ethereum? Same question for BTC. If we have to validate using a different layer can't it then be messed with once the actual ETH (or BTC) miners see the transaction?"
ethereum,"Internal transactions missing in Wallet  Dear community,

I have made my first sale this week on Rarible, via Opensea.  
However there is no transaction documented on my Metamask wallet after the purchase was made.

I waited 2 days but no change.

I checked the [contract ](https://etherscan.io/address/0x95C7F107623AD21eF9FB6A4A49bFFa950369D260#internaltx)on etherscan and it seems ok - my address is correct there and I see an internal Txns mention of those funds.

I am logged into the main Ethereum network but no matter where I look within the wallet I can't find any mention of this - no new ETH. I also tried adding the RARI token, both from the Metamask database and also with the custom token option, no luck - still not seeing any new funds added. 

Any idea what could have happened?

Thanks in advance"
ethereum,"What's the best way to do community building in crypto space. Hi everyone,

And I’m a newbie into the crypto space.

Background – Used to handle social media marketing for B2C startups.

Now, I’m joining a crypto-based startup that is for B2B enterprise.

One thing that I know about crypto startups is that they don’t have anything like marketing but community building.

So, I’m really new to this and never done community building for any B2B startups. 

Few things that I want to know –

1. What can be the best way to get started with crypto B2B space in terms of community building. (strategy)

2. Some of the ways to build community in this space.

Should I reach to individuals already in this space directly via Twitter or Telegram. (If you can suggest the names ) ?"
ethereum,"Question: What mathematical puzzle are miners trying to solve? Hey Guys! I have a question that i hope i can ask here. I wasnt able to find a proper answer to this online. Miners (PoS) generally speaking create a hash from all the transactions in a possible block and the Parent Hash. Then the mathematical puzzle is to finde a random number (nonce) that will result in a certain hash.

For Bitcoin this was easy to understand. Here (depending on the difficulty) the hash needs to be lower than a certain number (thus new blocks' hashes have so many beginning zeros). But here my question: what exactly are ethereum miners looking for. When looking at blocks on [etherscan.io](https://etherscan.io) i was not able to find a pattern. Is it also some kind of ""find a hash lower than 0x9...""? If anyone can help me out with the mining process in ethereum 1.0, that would be awesome.

Thank You!"
ethereum,"[DISCUSSION] Will NFTs create a faster Ethereum growth? Will NFTs becoming increasingly popular and normalized drive up the price of Ethereum, making it's monthly/yearly growth exceed expectations?"
ethereum,"Interested in working together on some ethereum projects or hackathons? Hi everyone! I'm a blockchain and full stack developer. 

Would anyone be interested in partnering and working together on some side projects or dapps? 

I'm interested in building anything that might show some promise on gaining users or we can also participate in crypto/defi hackathons to win prizes. I'm currently joining a chainlink hackathon this month. 

I think skillsets in either marketing and/or programming (blockchain or fullstack) would be good"
ethereum,Is it still possible to recover DAO eth? just curious I had a few lost in that event and couldnt figure it out
ethereum,"Best use cases of blockchain technology not yet implemented? I just found out about Theta. It's designed for decentralized streaming content. After doing some more research on other use cases i got interested if there we're some use cases not yet implemented. 

One that came to my mind was decentralized cloud storage. I'm not sure if there is any platforms used for that. If there is, let me know!

I would also like to know which kinds of use cases are people interested to see, but not yet implemented."
ethereum,"How can we contribute to ETH development? I’m a fairly elite software developer who happens to be very long ETH in my investment portfolio. Given that I have some spare time, it’d make a lot of sense if there were some way I could leverage my skill sets to increase the expected-value of my portfolio by strengthening the ETH ecosystem. The EIPs look pretty technically interesting and I’d love to get involved. Is there anything I can do?"
ethereum,"Looking for Developer Feedback Hi r/ethereum, hope your day is going swell.

I'm a lawyer whose been involved in a non-technical way for a few years. I'm non-technical, but I teach a Bitcoin/Crypto course to lawyers and professionals and have developed a bit of a practice manual for dealing with the additional complexities of clients who hold crypto of one sort or another.

This experience has led me to believe that there are a number of areas in the legal space that could be massively streamlined and would benefit from decentralization. There are actually areas where lawyers may even be able to be largely removed from the process.

I've focused on one of these and have drawn up how such a contract system and network could work. I'm trying to weigh the viability of such a project but don't have a rolodex of Ethereum developers who I can bounce ideas off of. If there is a viable project, I'm going to need to find some technical partners to team up with to start a build.

Is there a good forum or community where I can track these sorts of connections down and connect with some experienced developers?

Anywhere you can point me to, I'd be very appreciative."
ethereum,"Is there a list of all locked ETH? Between DeFi, Grayscale, staking, etc, is there a good overview somewhere of \*where\* all ETH is sitting right now and how much is locked up?"
ethereum,"Can smart contracts be developed to support businesses that require Trust accounts? Hello everyone,

I  have read many articles on Smart Contracts, but I am no expert  whatsoever.  I am still trying to learn and understand the concept of  Smart contracts, and how it can be applied to complex situations such as  the one described in the title.

I  run a small business that requires monies to be paid into a Trust  account until work is completed.  Furthermore, the interest (if any)  must be paid to a specific organization.  The business also requires  confidentiality to be considered by a governing body; which I believe  can be worked out since transactions do not need details when posted  onto the blockchain (AFAIK).

I would like to revolutionize my industry of work by adopting cryptocurrency to my business.

So  my question is: can Smart Contracts be implemented in a way where it  can act as a Trust holder, and pay out any necessary interest (if  accrued)?"
ethereum,WHEN WILL ETH FEES GO DOWN can soomeone tell me when eth fees will go down???? approximate
ethereum,"ETH txn fees and the long term impacts... King pessimist and Long time ETH HODLer here. Growing nervous and tired of the escalating transaction fees. It’s so frustrating because it limits our ability to take advantage of the Ethereum ecosystem. 

I know this is temporary but one has to wonder if there’s going to be a long term impact if this carries on beyond this year. EIP 1559 is hopeful and promising but the miner’s objection adds to the frustration. 

I am venting, sorry. But should I be as worried as I am? 

(Sidenote: buying more ETH with my tears)"
ethereum,"Fair price discovery for fair token auctions. We’re excited to announce a new product development from [@gnosisPM](https://twitter.com/gnosisPM), the [@GnosisAuction](https://twitter.com/GnosisAuction). We look forward to bringing price discovery through batch auctions to [#DeFi](https://twitter.com/hashtag/DeFi?src=hashtag_click)! Stay tuned for more information!!

[https://medium.com/@gnosisPM/introducing-gnosis-auction-ac30232b3595](https://medium.com/@gnosisPM/introducing-gnosis-auction-ac30232b3595)"
ethereum,How does Mintable gasless minting work? How does it work? Do you have ownership of your nft when you mint? Is ownership only valid when the art/ is sold. Does mintable own my work until it sells?
ethereum,"Thoughts on Otoco.io I've been studying DAOs for some time, and recently found out about [otoco.io](https://otoco.io). Their service seems to solve a lot of problems, but I'm been looking to see if I can find any people that have actually incorporated this way and how was it. I would appreciate very much to hear opinions, since I haven't been able to find much about clients."
ethereum,Ethereum 2.0 transaction fees? What can we expect? Surely not in the dollars?
ethereum,"Expectations for backwards-incompatible changes / removal of features that may come soon The time between now and the merge, and possibly a little bit after the merge, is going to be a time of significant change for the Ethereum protocol. **These changes are needed for many reasons**: proof of stake and scalability, others to enable stateless validation, and others to simplify the protocol and make it easier to maintain it in the long term, all **setting the stage for a more sustainable long-term Ethereum protocol**. However, **some of these changes are backwards-incompatible, in that they may break existing applications or render them uneconomical**.

In all cases, these incompatibilities affect only a small portion of use cases, and there are alternative ways to get the same functionality, but nevertheless it's important to talk about these proposals early, so that developers have as much of a heads up as possible, and so that we have as much time as possible to refine the proposals to minimize disruption.

**After the merge** and the other important changes that are already in the roadmap today are complete, **I continue to think that it would be valuable for the Ethereum protocol to ""ossify""**, changing much less going forward so as to maximize developers' feeling of stability and ability to rely on protocol features. However, such an ossification is best done *after* we take into account our learnings from the past 6 years and make this one last push to make some major improvements to Ethereum.

This is my attempt at a partial listing of some changes that may happen.

See also: [this doc](https://hackmd.io/@HWeNw8hNRimMm2m2GH56Cw/evm_feature_removing), though the actual changes proposed there only cover the EVM, and this post is broader.

## History storage changes

* After the Ethereum application state is moved over to the beacon chain as part of **the merge**, we may want to discard the ethereum PoW chain, and no longer support any transaction or history queries going back into the PoW chain. **This greatly simplifies clients, as they can simply forget all the pre-merge protocol rules** and thus have a smaller and leaner codebase going forward, but it does mean that dapps that rely on looking back into history need to find some other way to do so.
* Even outside of the context of the merge, **we likely want to move toward a model where ""the network"" is only expected to be responsible for the most recent 1 year of history (including txs/blocks/receipts)**. This prevents clients from incurring ever-growing storage burdens, but it does once again mean that dapps that require old history will need an alternative way to get it.

## Statelessness / state expiry

See [my other post on this topic](https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/comments/lw7ug3/weak_statelessness_andor_state_expiry_coming_soon/).

State expiry is definitely likely to be the one change in this list that requires the most significant changes for contracts; contracts that do not change probably will not *break* (as the most recent state expiry schemes ensure that if you can find a witness, you can continue using existing contracts as is for as long as you want), but developers *will* likely need to build new versions of contracts to remain gas-efficient.

## EVM changes

* [**EIP 2929**](https://eips.ethereum.org/EIPS/eip-2929) **(going into the upcoming Berlin hard fork)**, changing how SLOAD and calls/account accesses are priced. The first time an account or storage slot is accessed is now about 3x more expensive, but subsequent accesses are around 5-10x cheaper. On average, this only increases gas costs paid by users by \~0.3%, but it significantly improves the chain's DoS resistance and bounds on witness size.
* **Gas repricing for code witness size**: when we add code Merklization, to finish the job of bounding witness size we will need to charge some cost per chunk of code accessed in a transaction (eg. 400 gas per 32 byte chunk accessed). In general, this would somewhat increase the gas cost of ""simpler"" transactions (eg. an ERC20 approval accessed about 16 chunks so about 6.4k gas would be added) but it would only negligibly affect more complex transactions that loop over the same code many times. Gas limits can be adjusted upwards so that on average scalability remains the same as it was before, but even still, some applications may need to be rewritten to remain economical.
* **Removal or neutering of SELFDESTRUCT**: see [this whole document](https://hackmd.io/@HWeNw8hNRimMm2m2GH56Cw/selfdestruct) for the rationale.
* [**Removal of refunds**](https://eips.ethereum.org/EIPS/eip-3298) (proposed for the London hard fork), or limiting how refunds work, with the main goals of reducing block gas usage variance and freeing up blockchain space and storage being used by gastoken contracts.
* [**Removal of the 2300 gas stipend**](https://hackmd.io/@HWeNw8hNRimMm2m2GH56Cw/evm_feature_removing#The-2300-gas-stipend): a simplification to the protocol, removing a hard-coded value and hence making future gas cost changes more feasible
* **Replacing some precompiles with EVM code implementations**: this could be done mainly to simplify the protocol and the client code complexity, but it would inevitably come with gas cost changes.

## Miscellaneous

* **Ethereum is switching from RLP + hexary Patricia trees to SSZ and possibly Verkle trees**. This means that contracts that verify Merkle proofs into history will stop working at some point and will need to be rewritten. To allow developers to make Merkle proofs going forward, one possible route is to make an explicit ""history/state proof verification precompile"", so that whenever the state structure changes the precompile can change too, but of course this has not yet been implemented.
* **Block hashes will no longer be a good source of randomness** after the merge.
* The `DIFFICULTY` opcode will be useless after the merge (duh)
* **In the long run, quantum computers will break ECDSA and BLS**, and so everything that uses ECDSA or BLS will have to switch, and even ethereum 2.0 itself will have to move from BLS to a post-quantum aggregable signature scheme. **Fortunately, there has been a lot of work done recently by Starkware and others on making such schemes more efficient**, so we are very confident that we will survive the transition; but contract developers should necessarily be aware that this will happen.

There are likely items that I have missed, but this covers at least some of the important things that are worth watching out for. I highly encourage application developers and others to participate in this process and do so early, so that the protocol changes that end up happening can be done in a way that is as minimally disruptive as possible."
ethereum,"List GWEI in $USD as well I totally get the reluctance to do so, but we really do need to express all this GWEI stuff in $ USD as well.

Why?

Cos it takes a loooong time to really get used to a new currency.

I've lived in SE Asia for about 16 years now, and I know it was at LEAST 5 years before I stopped looking at prices and quickly calculating what that meant in ""real"" money.

Now, today, I genuinely look at prices in Malaysian ringgit, and if I see a price in GBP or USD I now do the opposite, and quickly calculate what the heck that means in ringgit!

My point is money, and its currency, is really, really, deeply embedded in our heads. We cannot comfortably spend money without a little voice in the back of our head figuring it out in 'real money'. 

We can deny that, each of us can claim to be an exception, that you're so yung n trendi that you're not affected - but yes you are, and sure as heck noobs coming in are.

Just throwing it out there, for y'all to think about :)"
ethereum,"vaccination proof Hi All, 

Just a quick question on what ethereum could do ? 

International travels have been drastically reduced because of Covid, and we are hearing a lot about a “green” passport which would provide a proof of your vaccination. Could you this be implemented with ethereum and make it easier to prove that you have been vaccinated ? 

Thanks 😊"
ethereum,"Phone designed for DApps Crazy idea, but would people be interested in a phone that is designed to support DApps? With the Apple Store and Google Play Store, it’s impossible to download DApps and there doesn’t seem to be any push to make this possible. 

In terms of long term vision, you could think of the phone as a potential competitor to Apple or Samsung phones in the sense that it would be a mobile phone, but it would carry an App Store that provides accessibility to both DApps and traditional apps like Facebook, Reddit, etc. 

I’d love to hear people’s thoughts on this (pros/cons, feedback etc.) and whether they’d be interested in buying a phone that is designed to support DApps. 

Even crazier thought, if people are genuinely interested in possibly working on this project, feel free to message me"
ethereum,"Interesting Ethereum Use Case? GoFundMe 2.0 As I have been stewing all day about how I can externally fund some my PhD costs starting in September aside from work in the Summer I came to two ideas: I start an OnlyFans and hope that there is a niche market of creepy guys that are into average looking 6.5 to 7.5 (on a good day) / 10 guys doing weird shit, or I start a GoFundMe and pray that enough people give a shit about economics and invasive species that they'll pitch in to help me achieve that personal goal. 

But then I looked at my cryptos today like I always fucking do and I thought to myself: Wouldn't it be great if there was a GoFundMe for cryptos? And then I thought that it could potentially be an easy use case for a dapp on Ethereum. It would be sooo easy for the GoFundMe donators to see that when enough money gets put in the pool that the smart contract could execute and do what it needs to do in the objective of the GoFundMe. 

So if I said for example that I wanted to try and pay off part of my tuition, the smart contract would build up enough crypto equivalents from the donations and then execute on an exchange or something to convert to stablecoins and send to the target wallet address (the university). This way if I donate to the GoFundMe I know for damn sure it's going to where it should be going instead of ending up in some guys back pocket or lost to fucking UniSwap on a bad trade."
ethereum,"Staking rewards for your own node vs 3rd party I was wondering how much more staking rewards you receive by doing it yourself vs a 3rd party.

Right now I am staking with Kraken and calculated that I am getting 7.7% yearly. I know they take about 15% which would mean I would be making 9% if I did it on my own. Does this seem like an accurate number? I am having a hard time finding some numbers on this"
ethereum,"Proof of Stake Computing Power? Posted about this before but it got flagged as spam and deleted.

Simple question: If the network is currently burdened as-is, how will \*reducing\* the computing power by transitioning to proof-of-stake benefit the ""global computer"" that is the Ethereum network in the long run? Or is that not the goal for the network?

I know with Proof of Work, there's currently a lot of garbage bundled with meaningful computation to artificially inflate the workload as a distribution mechanism. Will removing that garbage and vacating all of that computing power still leave a powerful cloud computer in its place? Or will the network's total computing potential be hugely cut back without hundreds of thousands of GPU and teraflops committed to the task?   


I guess it's a hybrid proof-of-stake, but the network without that garbage must still have steep computing demands, especially if it were to continue growing."
ethereum,"Noob question about Staking ETH on Coinbase When you stake ETH for the 2.0 network that’s upcoming, I understand it becomes unavailable / locked.

My question is around it’s value. To keep it simple, I’ll just use 1 ETH in my scenario.

If i was to stake 1 ETH right now, I would earn 7.5% back on that staked ETH. My question, is if ETH were to go 10x it’s current price, does my staked ETH also increase in value 10x, or is it locked at the price i staked it at?"
ethereum,"Most privacy-oriented Eth wallet with HW wallet support? Curious if there is a wallet for eth that works with hardware wallets and minimizes the risk of being spied on by connecting servers (balances, IPs, etc), similarly to what is possible with some bitcoin wallets (wasabi, electrum, sparrow).

Asking for a friend."
ethereum,is jaxx.io safe im new to ethereum
ethereum,"App to track ETH network fees? Obviously this is a known/common issue, but is there an iOS app that monitors and tracks ETH network fees and can let you know when it falls beneath a set threshold?

If not, there should be. Just give me 2% of royalties."
ethereum,"Interview by Swiss Prof. in Distributed Ledger Technology (Blockchain) / FinTech about DeFi and Smart Contracts Hi everyone,

I saw an interesting interview with Prof. Schär about the disruption potential and application prospect of DeFi's and Smart Contracts in one of Switzerland biggest news.

Interview in German: [https://www.watson.ch/wirtschaft/wissen/813917630-krypto-experte-schaer-defi-ist-hoechst-interessant-aber-extrem-riskant](https://www.watson.ch/wirtschaft/wissen/813917630-krypto-experte-schaer-defi-ist-hoechst-interessant-aber-extrem-riskant)

Google Translate: [https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=de&amp;tl=en&amp;u=https://www.watson.ch/wirtschaft/wissen/813917630-krypto-experte-schaer-defi-ist-hoechst-interessant-aber-extrem-riskant](https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=de&amp;tl=en&amp;u=https://www.watson.ch/wirtschaft/wissen/813917630-krypto-experte-schaer-defi-ist-hoechst-interessant-aber-extrem-riskant)

The University of Basel will also open up its blockchain lectures to the public in the future!"
ethereum,"Need some pointers for detailed rinkeby analysis For a uni CTF I need to get the transactions on the rinkeby chain between two dates of February this year, but all the chain explorers I seem to find online either don't support the time filter, or don't support the rinkeby chain. 

How can I get these transactions? Maybe through some api"
ethereum,Ethereum name origin Ok my fellow Ethereuminians. Where do you think the word Ethereum started. I saw a movie from 1986 that has Ethereum in it in the shape of the logo. Is there anything earlier we can stem it back too? I'll say the movie when I get some guesses on the post. I wanna hear outside answers.
ethereum,"How many shards could the beacon chain serve without getting too big? As I understand it, the only downside of adding additional shards to Ethereum 2 is that the beacon chain gets bigger. Because it stores metadata about every block of every shard.

Initially, there will be 64 shards. Will this use up the maximum amount of resources that Ethereum 2 should consume on a single node? Or is there room left to grow? If so, how much?"
ethereum,"Selling Art for Crypto Hi all. I know few things about NFT - selling digital art for crypto. BUT. I struggle to find anything for. selling traditional art and getting paid in Crypto.

I've been into crypto for the last couple of months and I want to market my art (oil paintings) that I'd accept cryptocurrency as a payment without sounding pretentious (if that makes sense).

Does anyone know any artists who do that? Or does anyone have any suggestions? 

Hope I am in the right place asking this"
ethereum,"What is Optimism? Nice post on Twitter

https://twitter.com/0xrafi/status/1366864714664402947?s=24"
ethereum,"I’m trying to upload artwork to OpenSea but the fees are too high, is there anyway around this? I want to upload artwork to OpenSea but when I try and upload there is a “free transaction” that must occur to allow OpenSea to sell items on my account. The fee for this transaction is currently 91 USD worth of ethereum, is this reasonable, and is there a way to get away with paying a lower fee? I currently have 46 USD allocated to paying this fee is there anyway to get it that low?"
ethereum,"Weak statelessness and/or state expiry: coming soon (x-post from EthMagicians) One of the next major challenges for the Ethereum base layer is that  of dealing with the growing state size: currently around 100 GB  including tree nodes and growing by around 50 GB per year. The growing  state is making it increasingly harder to sync the ethereum chain and to  participate as a validator, and risks increasing network centralization  if the state grows, especially if the gas limit is increased further.

There are two main techniques being proposed for how to deal with this problem for the short term:

* **State expiry**: remove state that has not been recently  accessed from the state (think: accessed in the last year), and require  witnesses to revive expired state. This would reduce the state that *everyone* needs to store to a flat \~20-50 GB.
* **Weak statelessness**: only require block proposers to store state, and allow all other nodes to verify blocks statelessly.

Both solutions are well underway in development, and it feels like  around now is the time to switch gear from seeing these ideas as  research problems to seeing them as concrete paths of which at least one  (and perhaps eventually both) need to be implemented into Ethereum.

EthMagicians link: [https://ethereum-magicians.org/t/weak-statelessness-and-or-state-expiry-coming-soon/5453](https://ethereum-magicians.org/t/weak-statelessness-and-or-state-expiry-coming-soon/5453)

Some things I link to inside the EthMagicians link:

* My recent doc on state expiry: [https://hackmd.io/@HWeNw8hNRimMm2m2GH56Cw/state\_size\_management](https://hackmd.io/@HWeNw8hNRimMm2m2GH56Cw/state_size_management)
* An idea on how to do state expiry / regenesis while minimizing resurrection conflict issues: [https://ethresear.ch/t/resurrection-conflict-minimized-state-bounding-take-2/8739](https://ethresear.ch/t/resurrection-conflict-minimized-state-bounding-take-2/8739)
* Verkle trees (very important concept): [slides](https://vitalik.ca/files/misc_files/verkle.pdf), [doc](https://notes.ethereum.org/_N1mutVERDKtqGIEYc-Flw), [code](https://github.com/ethereum/research/tree/master/verkle_trie)
* Dankrad's case for weak statelessness: [https://notes.ethereum.org/WUUUXBKWQXORxpFMlLWy-w](https://notes.ethereum.org/WUUUXBKWQXORxpFMlLWy-w)
* Piper Merriam's work on distributed state storage and state and witness availability: [https://ethresear.ch/t/scalable-transaction-gossip/8660](https://ethresear.ch/t/scalable-transaction-gossip/8660) and [https://github.com/ethereum/stateless-ethereum-specs/pull/54](https://github.com/ethereum/stateless-ethereum-specs/pull/54)

Happy to answer questions about any of this!"
ethereum,"I think adopting Etheruem for president voting is really nice But I never see any country do it. It is good because of many reasons 
1. Transparency 
2. Cost savings 
3. Save time"
ethereum,"What are the benefits of DeFi over current mainstream lending systems? This feels like a newb question to ask, and believe me I am, but I swear I’ve searched this subreddit along with others like it for a direct answer to this question and come up empty handed. If it *has* been answered before, if you could please link to the relevant info I would very much appreciate it. Otherwise, anyone have a good answer?"
ethereum,"Registrations are live for Chainlink Virtual Hackathon! Build DeFi, NFT, and Gaming dApps with $80k+ in prizes, hear from top projects and developers in crypto, and much more 🎉 Hi friends,

I wanted to share that registrations for the Chainlink Virtual Hackathon are now open.

**Join us from March 15th - April 11th:**

* Compete to win part of $80k+ in prizes
* DeFi, gaming, sponsor, and more categories
* Every participant that submits a valid project earns 1 LINK
* Learn how to use the most widely adopted blockchain oracles
* Workshops with developers from the top projects in crypto
* Be seen by blockchain industry recruiters

There are many way to participate whether you are an experienced blockchain developer or just looking to learn more and grow your skills. Make sure to register here to get started: [http://chn.lk/3aEozOC](http://chn.lk/3aEozOC)"
ethereum,"What does ethereum use the processing power for? Me and a friend have two different ideas one of us thinks it's used for data mining the other thinks it's for creating compute power that can be rented out kind of like with a super computer. Which one of us is closer or are we both wrong and it is just arbitrary tasks to limit how fast you can mine ethereum, or something else entirely?"
ethereum,Optimism vs Matic Any thoughts on which will be bigger in the coming months?
ethereum,"Tokenizing a painting on Ethereum Hello Ethereum brothers :)

So I have a painting done in 2017, that I would like to tokenize and maybe sell in the future. I am not tech savvy. Are there any sites/gateways that would allow me to do it in easy manner?

[https://imgur.com/gallery/S6QYMso](https://imgur.com/gallery/S6QYMso)

Cheers!"
ethereum,"Poll: Should we ban NFT advertisements from r/Ethereum? Question: Should NFT advertisements be banned from r/Ethereum? 

Up-vote = yes, we ban NFT advertising; topics about NFT as a technology are okay. 

Down-vote = no, NFT advertisements should be accepted, people just want to share their creations.

Edit: Please go to the following post that has a real link —&gt; https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/comments/lvi19w/should_we_ban_nft_ads_on_rethereum/ 

Edit: This poll is flawed because it doesn’t adequately represent the people who want NFT content (by this I mean posting of specific minted NFTs that have a price, not discussing NFTs generally). I didn’t have the option to post a poll on mobile, so if someone can make a post that can improve this existing post, please do and I’ll delete this. We want a poll to accurately reflect the community."
ethereum,"eip-1559 Hi noob here
Just wondering if I need to do anything if or when this comes into play
Have some eth in cold storage

Thank"
ethereum,"Anyone have Kovan eth? Trying to test something with aave but can’t find a faucet. My address is 

0x426B73eE435eA4F2a3774D529856bAcdbf163B8A

Much thanks"
ethereum,"New Ether-backed ETP will be listed on the SIX Swiss Exchange under the ticker ETHE.  One of Europe’s largest crypto investment firms, CoinShares, is launching a physically-backed exchange-traded product (ETP) focused on Ethereum.  
Source: [https://cryptobriefing.com/coinshares-launches-ethereum-backed-etp-worth-75-million/](https://cryptobriefing.com/coinshares-launches-ethereum-backed-etp-worth-75-million/)"
ethereum,"I messed up through lack of understanding. Tried to mint 999 tokens and it's 'dropped' So I tried to mint my digital art on rarible cos someone threatened to do it before me, using a low res screenshot copy of my art work. I panicked and rushed the process of trying to mint it on rarible. I set 999 copies and the total gas price was  $24.89 which I seemingly paid. However it's been pending for 3 hours and when I clicked to go to etherscan, it says it's 'Dropped'. I clearly don't know what I'm doing... I want to try re-do this but maybe only do 3 copies or something. ELI5 :("
ethereum,"Royalties for artists from NFTs associated with physical artwork Hi guys, new to NFTs and trying to wrap my head around some specific concepts!

I'm looking for some more information regarding how NFTs might benefit artists with existing artwork or even the families of artists who have passed away. 

I understand that the smart contracts associated with NFTs can allow artists to receive perpetual royalties from resales of their digital art, as this is all executed online, including the delivery of the art. 

When it comes to physical art though, how would you go about including the percentage royalty in the NFT for physical art? Is it a matter as simple as it is with digital art where you just execute everything online except for delivery of the art? 

Could someone walk me through how this process might work with physical art? Are there any extra challenges compared to doing this with digital art? 

Really appreciate it if anyone has knowledge on this and would be willing to share! Any resources where I might learn more about this would also be amazing. 

Thanks so much!"
ethereum,"What's happened to paper wallet creation? I'm cold storing some Bitcoin and Ethereum. I've had a look at hardware wallets but they seem like a real faff to deal with. So I've created Bitcoin paper wallet (offline using a clean linux machine) - easy peasy, no hardware to go wrong that requires separate piece of paper anyway with recovery code. 

But when it comes to creating Ethereum wallet I can find articles describing how to make a paper one - but the MEW site has changed now and it doesn't seem to work. I think I have to create a wallet using keystone file (online?) and then when I access it on the MEW website (inputting the password, which I don't know what that is for) I can see the wallet and print a copy of the public and private keys. But by that point it's been loaded onto a website on a computer connected to internet - not secure? 

Is there not a way to create a wallet offline and then send some Eth to it afterwards?"
ethereum,"Overview of EIP-2315 for Berlin upgrade by Greg Colvin  PEEPanEIP #25: [EIP-2315: Simple Subroutines for the EVM with Greg](https://youtu.be/c3Zo8vPwtk0)

Other Berlin EIPs

* [EIP-2565: ModExp Gas Cost](https://youtu.be/riBALRAw1Mw)
* [EIP-2718: Typed Transaction Envelope](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JReJRJ5G_UA&amp;list=PL4cwHXAawZxqu0PKKyMzG_3BJV_xZTi1F&amp;index=15&amp;t=5s)
* [EIP-2929 &amp; EIP-2930](https://youtu.be/qQpvkxKso2E)

 **#education** **#PEEPanEIP** **#Ethereum** **#Berlin**"
ethereum,"Noob question about transfer fees If I have an even number of ethereum coins I bought through Coinbase exchange, let’s just say 1 whole coin, and I want to transfer it to a soft wallet... where are the fees taken from?  Would they be taken out of the coin itself, leaving me with some fraction of a coin?  That would kill my OCD as I’d like to have an exact whole number of a coin.

If so, is there a way to pay the transfer fees separately without it being taken from the coin itself?"
ethereum,"A proposal for cross-rollup DEX (ethresear.ch) One of the challenges with rollups is that it is difficult to move between them: if you have funds in zksync but want to send them to someone who has a loopring account, currently the best approach is to withdraw to layer-1 and then re-deposit to loopring. This is really inefficient, costing you a full layer-1 gas fee, and furthermore it is very slow (especially with optimistic rollups where withdrawal takes a week). Here I propose a design for a decentralized/trust-minimized mechanism that allows users to move between rollups directly and potentially very quickly, as long as there is some liquidity provider willing to facilitate the trade. The mechanism only requires one side to be fully smart-contract/EVM capable; the other side can be a minimalistic rollup with no features other than sending coins. This mechanism could make life much easier for users trying to navigate the rollup ecosystem.

See link here: [https://ethresear.ch/t/cross-rollup-dex-with-smart-contracts-only-on-the-destination-side/8778](https://ethresear.ch/t/cross-rollup-dex-with-smart-contracts-only-on-the-destination-side/8778)"
ethereum,What wallet do you use? I started with Coinbase and that’s what I have now. I saw r/Coinbase though and everyone says I’m gonna get my money stolen. What should I use
